dictionaries/fr_FR-reformed/fr_FR-reformed.aff
FLAG long
SFX d5 Y 110
SFX d5 er er/36 er 22
SFX d5 er ant/36 er 23
SFX d5 eter ette/31 jeter 28
SFX d5 eter ète/31 [^j]eter 28
SFX d5 eler elle/31 ppeler 28
SFX d5 eler èle/31 [^p].eler 28
SFX d5 eter ettes/32 jeter 29
SFX d5 eter ètes/32 [^j]eter 29
SFX d5 eler elles/32 ppeler 29
SFX d5 eler èles/32 [^p].eler 29
SFX d5 eter ette/30 jeter 30
SFX d5 eter ète/30 [^j]eter 30
SFX d5 eler elle/30 ppeler 30
SFX d5 eler èle/30 [^p].eler 30
SFX d5 er ons/33 er 31
SFX d5 er ez/34 er 32
SFX d5 eter ettent/30 jeter 33
SFX d5 eter ètent/30 [^j]eter 33
SFX d5 eler ellent/30 ppeler 33
SFX d5 eler èlent/30 [^p].eler 33
SFX d5 er ais/31 er 34
SFX d5 er ais/32 er 35
SFX d5 er ait/30 er 36
SFX d5 er ions/33 er 37
SFX d5 er iez/34 er 38
SFX d5 er aient/30 er 39
SFX d5 er ai/31 er 40
SFX d5 er as/32 er 42
SFX d5 er a/30 er 43
SFX d5 er âmes/33 er 44
SFX d5 er âtes/34 er 45
SFX d5 er èrent/30 er 46
SFX d5 eter etterai/31 jeter 47
SFX d5 eter èterai/31 [^j]eter 47
SFX d5 eler ellerai/31 ppeler 47
SFX d5 eler èlerai/31 [^p].eler 47
SFX d5 eter etteras/32 jeter 48
SFX d5 eter èteras/32 [^j]eter 48
SFX d5 eler elleras/32 ppeler 48
SFX d5 eler èleras/32 [^p].eler 48
SFX d5 eter ettera/30 jeter 49
SFX d5 eter ètera/30 [^j]eter 49
SFX d5 eler ellera/30 ppeler 49
SFX d5 eler èlera/30 [^p].eler 49
SFX d5 eter etterons/33 jeter 50
SFX d5 eter èterons/33 [^j]eter 50
SFX d5 eler ellerons/33 ppeler 50
SFX d5 eler èlerons/33 [^p].eler 50
SFX d5 eter etterez/34 jeter 51
SFX d5 eter èterez/34 [^j]eter 51
SFX d5 eler ellerez/34 ppeler 51
SFX d5 eler èlerez/34 [^p].eler 51
SFX d5 eter etteront/30 jeter 52
SFX d5 eter èteront/30 [^j]eter 52
SFX d5 eler elleront/30 ppeler 52
SFX d5 eler èleront/30 [^p].eler 52
SFX d5 eter etterais/31 jeter 53
SFX d5 eter èterais/31 [^j]eter 53
SFX d5 eler ellerais/31 ppeler 53
SFX d5 eler èlerais/31 [^p].eler 53
SFX d5 eter etterais/32 jeter 54
SFX d5 eter èterais/32 [^j]eter 54
SFX d5 eler ellerais/32 ppeler 54
SFX d5 eler èlerais/32 [^p].eler 54
SFX d5 eter etterait/30 jeter 55
SFX d5 eter èterait/30 [^j]eter 55
SFX d5 eler ellerait/30 ppeler 55
SFX d5 eler èlerait/30 [^p].eler 55
SFX d5 eter etterions/33 jeter 56
SFX d5 eter èterions/33 [^j]eter 56
SFX d5 eler ellerions/33 ppeler 56
SFX d5 eler èlerions/33 [^p].eler 56
SFX d5 eter etteriez/34 jeter 57
SFX d5 eter èteriez/34 [^j]eter 57
SFX d5 eler elleriez/34 ppeler 57
SFX d5 eler èleriez/34 [^p].eler 57
SFX d5 eter etteraient/30 jeter 58
SFX d5 eter èteraient/30 [^j]eter 58
SFX d5 eler elleraient/30 ppeler 58
SFX d5 eler èleraient/30 [^p].eler 58
SFX d5 eter ette/31 jeter 59
SFX d5 eter ète/31 [^j]eter 59
SFX d5 eler elle/31 ppeler 59
SFX d5 eler èle/31 [^p].eler 59
SFX d5 eter ettes/32 jeter 60
SFX d5 eter ètes/32 [^j]eter 60
SFX d5 eler elles/32 ppeler 60
SFX d5 eler èles/32 [^p].eler 60
SFX d5 eter ette/30 jeter 61
SFX d5 eter ète/30 [^j]eter 61
SFX d5 eler elle/30 ppeler 61
SFX d5 eler èle/30 [^p].eler 61
SFX d5 er ions/33 er 62
SFX d5 er iez/34 er 63
SFX d5 eter ettent/30 jeter 64
SFX d5 eter ètent/30 [^j]eter 64
SFX d5 eler ellent/30 ppeler 64
SFX d5 eler èlent/30 [^p].eler 64
SFX d5 er asse/31 er 65
SFX d5 er asses/32 er 66
SFX d5 er ât/30 er 67
SFX d5 er assions/33 er 68
SFX d5 er assiez/34 er 69
SFX d5 er assent/30 er 70
SFX d5 eter ette/26 jeter 71
SFX d5 eter ète/26 [^j]eter 71
SFX d5 eler elle/26 ppeler 71
SFX d5 eler èle/26 [^p].eler 71
SFX d5 er ons er 72
SFX d5 er ez er 73

SFX aA Y 57
SFX aA ller ller/39 aller 22
SFX aA ller llant/40 aller 23
SFX aA ller llé/41 aller 24
SFX aA ller llés/41 aller 25
SFX aA ller llée/41 aller 26
SFX aA ller llées/41 aller 27
SFX aA aller vais aller 28
SFX aA aller vas aller 29
SFX aA aller va aller 30
SFX aA ller llons/21 aller 31
SFX aA ller llez/21 aller 32
SFX aA aller vont aller 33
SFX aA ller llais/42 aller 34
SFX aA ller llais/21 aller 35
SFX aA ller llait/40 aller 36
SFX aA ller llions/21 aller 37
SFX aA ller lliez/21 aller 38
SFX aA ller llaient/40 aller 39
SFX aA ller llai/42 aller 40
SFX aA ller llas/21 aller 42
SFX aA ller lla/40 aller 43
SFX aA ller llâmes/21 aller 44
SFX aA ller llâtes/21 aller 45
SFX aA ller llèrent/40 aller 46
SFX aA aller irai/42 aller 47
SFX aA aller iras/21 aller 48
SFX aA aller ira/40 aller 49
SFX aA aller irons/21 aller 50
SFX aA aller irez/40 aller 51
SFX aA aller iront/21 aller 52
SFX aA aller irais/42 aller 53
SFX aA aller irais/21 aller 54
SFX aA aller irait/40 aller 55
SFX aA aller irions/21 aller 56
SFX aA aller iriez/21 aller 57
SFX aA aller iraient/40 aller 58
SFX aA ller ille/22 aller 59
SFX aA ller illes/16 aller 60
SFX aA ller ille/40 aller 61
SFX aA ller llions/16 aller 62
SFX aA ller lliez/16 aller 63
SFX aA ller illent/40 aller 64
SFX aA ller llasse/42 aller 65
SFX aA ller llasses/21 aller 66
SFX aA ller llât/40 aller 67
SFX aA ller llassions/21 aller 68
SFX aA ller llassiez/21 aller 69
SFX aA ller llassent/40 aller 70
SFX aA ller llons/16 aller 72
SFX aA aller va aller 71
SFX aA aller vas-y aller 75
SFX aA aller va-t'en aller 76
SFX aA ller llons-y aller 77
SFX aA ller llons-nous-en aller 78
SFX aA ller llez/16 aller 73
SFX aA ller llez-y aller 79
SFX aA ller llez-vous-en aller 80

SFX aD Y 51
SFX aD voyer voyer/17 envoyer 22
SFX aD voyer voyant/18 envoyer 23
SFX aD voyer voyé/41 envoyer 24
SFX aD voyer voyés/41 envoyer 25
SFX aD voyer voyée/41 envoyer 26
SFX aD voyer voyées/41 envoyer 27
SFX aD voyer voie/11 envoyer 28
SFX aD voyer voies/6 envoyer 29
SFX aD voyer voie/18 envoyer 30
SFX aD voyer voyons/9 envoyer 31
SFX aD voyer voyez/10 envoyer 32
SFX aD voyer voient/18 envoyer 33
SFX aD voyer voyais/11 envoyer 34
SFX aD voyer voyais/6 envoyer 35
SFX aD voyer voyait/18 envoyer 36
SFX aD voyer voyions/9 envoyer 37
SFX aD voyer voyiez/10 envoyer 38
SFX aD voyer voyaient/18 envoyer 39
SFX aD voyer voyai/11 envoyer 40
SFX aD voyer voyas/6 envoyer 42
SFX aD voyer voya/18 envoyer 43
SFX aD voyer voyâmes/9 envoyer 44
SFX aD voyer voyâtes/10 envoyer 45
SFX aD voyer voyèrent/18 envoyer 46
SFX aD voyer verrai/11 envoyer 47
SFX aD voyer verras/6 envoyer 48
SFX aD voyer verra/18 envoyer 49
SFX aD voyer verrons/9 envoyer 50
SFX aD voyer verrez/10 envoyer 51
SFX aD voyer verront/18 envoyer 52
SFX aD voyer verrais/11 envoyer 53
SFX aD voyer verrais/6 envoyer 54
SFX aD voyer verrait/18 envoyer 55
SFX aD voyer verrions/9 envoyer 56
SFX aD voyer verriez/10 envoyer 57
SFX aD voyer verraient/18 envoyer 58
SFX aD voyer voie/12 envoyer 59
SFX aD voyer voies/13 envoyer 60
SFX aD voyer voie/18 envoyer 61
SFX aD voyer voyions/14 envoyer 62
SFX aD voyer voyiez/15 envoyer 63
SFX aD voyer voient/18 envoyer 64
SFX aD voyer voyasse/11 envoyer 65
SFX aD voyer voyasses/6 envoyer 66
SFX aD voyer voyât/18 envoyer 67
SFX aD voyer voyassions/9 envoyer 68
SFX aD voyer voyassiez/10 envoyer 69
SFX aD voyer voyassent/18 envoyer 70
SFX aD voyer voie/13 envoyer 71
SFX aD voyer voyons/24 envoyer 72
SFX aD voyer voyez/15 envoyer 73

SFX aE Y 6
SFX aE direr direr/17 direr 22
SFX aE direr dirant/18 direr 23
SFX aE direr diré/41 direr 24
SFX aE direr dirés/41 direr 25
SFX aE direr dirée/41 direr 26
SFX aE direr dirées/41 direr 27

SFX aF N 16
SFX aF cerner cerner er 22
SFX aF cerner cernant er 23
SFX aF cerner cerné er 24
SFX aF cerner cernés er 25
SFX aF cerner cernée er 26
SFX aF cerner cernées er 27
SFX aF cerner cerne er 30
SFX aF cerner cernent er 33
SFX aF cerner cernait er 36
SFX aF cerner cernaient er 39
SFX aF cerner cerna er 43
SFX aF cerner cernèrent er 46
SFX aF cerner cernera er 49
SFX aF cerner cerneront er 52
SFX aF cerner cernerait er 55
SFX aF cerner cerneraient er 58

SFX aG Y 15
SFX aG er er/39 er 22
SFX aG er ant/40 er 23
SFX aG er é er 24
SFX aG er e/40 er 30
SFX aG er ent/40 er 33
SFX aG er ait/40 er 36
SFX aG er aient/40 er 39
SFX aG er a/40 er 43
SFX aG er èrent/40 er 46
SFX aG er ât/40 er 36
SFX aG er assent/40 er 39
SFX aG er era/40 er 49
SFX aG er eront/40 er 52
SFX aG er erait/40 er 55
SFX aG er eraient/40 er 58

SFX aH N 48
SFX aH er er gger 22
SFX aH er ant gger 23
SFX aH er é gger 24
SFX aH er e gger 28
SFX aH er es gger 29
SFX aH er e gger 30
SFX aH er ons gger 31
SFX aH er ez gger 32
SFX aH er ent gger 33
SFX aH er ais gger 34
SFX aH er ais gger 35
SFX aH er ait gger 36
SFX aH er ions gger 37
SFX aH er iez gger 38
SFX aH er aient gger 39
SFX aH er ai gger 40
SFX aH er as gger 42
SFX aH er a gger 43
SFX aH er âmes gger 44
SFX aH er âtes gger 45
SFX aH er èrent gger 46
SFX aH er erai gger 47
SFX aH er eras gger 48
SFX aH er era gger 49
SFX aH er erons gger 50
SFX aH er erez gger 51
SFX aH er eront gger 52
SFX aH er erais gger 53
SFX aH er erais gger 54
SFX aH er erait gger 55
SFX aH er erions gger 56
SFX aH er eriez gger 57
SFX aH er eraient gger 58
SFX aH er e gger 59
SFX aH er es gger 60
SFX aH er e gger 61
SFX aH er ions gger 62
SFX aH er iez gger 63
SFX aH er ent gger 64
SFX aH er asse gger 65
SFX aH er asses gger 66
SFX aH er ât gger 67
SFX aH er assions gger 68
SFX aH er assiez gger 69
SFX aH er assent gger 70
SFX aH er e gger 71
SFX aH er ons gger 72
SFX aH er ez gger 73

SFX aY N 51
SFX aY neler neler neler 22
SFX aY neler nelant neler 23
SFX aY neler nelé neler 24
SFX aY neler nelés neler 25
SFX aY neler nelée neler 26
SFX aY neler nelées neler 27
SFX aY èneler énèle èneler 28
SFX aY èneler énèles èneler 29
SFX aY èneler énèle èneler 30
SFX aY neler nelons neler 31
SFX aY neler nelez neler 32
SFX aY èneler énèlent èneler 33
SFX aY neler nelais neler 34
SFX aY neler nelais neler 35
SFX aY neler nelait neler 36
SFX aY neler nelions neler 37
SFX aY neler neliez neler 38
SFX aY neler nelaient neler 39
SFX aY neler nelai neler 40
SFX aY neler nelas neler 42
SFX aY neler nela neler 43
SFX aY neler nelâmes neler 44
SFX aY neler nelâtes neler 45
SFX aY neler nelèrent neler 46
SFX aY èneler énèlerai èneler 47
SFX aY èneler énèleras èneler 48
SFX aY èneler énèlera èneler 49
SFX aY èneler énèlerons èneler 50
SFX aY èneler énèlerez èneler 51
SFX aY èneler énèleront èneler 52
SFX aY èneler énèlerais èneler 53
SFX aY èneler énèlerais èneler 54
SFX aY èneler énèlerait èneler 55
SFX aY èneler énèlerions èneler 56
SFX aY èneler énèleriez èneler 57
SFX aY èneler énèleraient èneler 58
SFX aY èneler énèle èneler 59
SFX aY èneler énèles èneler 60
SFX aY èneler énèle èneler 61
SFX aY neler nelions neler 62
SFX aY neler neliez neler 63
SFX aY èneler énèlent èneler 64
SFX aY neler nelasse neler 65
SFX aY neler nelasses neler 66
SFX aY neler nelât neler 67
SFX aY neler nelassions neler 68
SFX aY neler nelassiez neler 69
SFX aY neler nelassent neler 70
SFX aY èneler énèle èneler 71
SFX aY neler nelons neler 72
SFX aY neler nelez neler 73
